src/import/noninflecting_adjectives.lexc
tõestamata+A:t´õestamata GI ;
tõistre+A:t´õistre GI ;
tõrgeteta+A:tõrgeteta GI ;
tõrksavõitu+A:t´õrksa#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@tõrssis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´õrssis GI ;
tõttamata+A:t´õttamata GI ;
tähelepanuväärt+A:tähele#panu#v´äärt GI ;
tähtajata+A:t´äht#ajata GI ;
@P.Case.Short@täis+A:@P.Case.Short@t´äis GI ;
täiskirjutatud+A:t´äis#kirjutatud GI ;
täitmata+A:t´äitmata GI ;
täppidega+A:t´äppidega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@töllakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@töllakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@töllis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´öl,lis GI ;
töötlemata+A:t´öötlemata GI ;
tühjavõitu+A:tühja#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@tükkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@t´ükkis GI ;
tüsedavõitu+A:tüseda#v´õitu GI ;
udukarva+A:udu#k´arva GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@umbes+A:@P.Case.Ine@´umbes GI ;
ummikus+A:ummikus GI ;
unaruses+A:unaruses GI ;
unustuses+A:unustuses GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@upakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@upakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@uppis+A:@P.Case.Ine@´uppis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@urvakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@urvakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@uurakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@uurakil GI ;
va+A:va #;
vaesevõitu+A:v´aese#v´õitu GI ;
vahakarva+A:vaha#k´arva GI ;
vahelduseta+A:vahelduseta GI ;
vahetpidamata+A:vahet#pidamata GI ;
valatud+A:valatud GI ;
valduses+A:v´alduses GI ;
valgetverd+A:valget#v´erd GI ;
valikuta+A:valikuta GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@valmis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´al,mis GI ;
valvel+A:v´alvel GI ;
vanavõitu+A:vana#v´õitu GI ;
varesekarva+A:varese#k´arva GI ;
varjamata+A:v´arjamata GI ;
vastamata+A:v´astamata GI ;
veekalkvel+A:v´ee#k´alkvel GI ;
verevärvi+A:vere#v´ärvi GI ;
vesiloodis+A:ves,i#l´ood,is GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vidukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@vidukil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vidus+A:@P.Case.Ine@vidus GI ;
vigadega+A:vigadega GI ;
vigadeta+A:vigadeta GI ;
vigastamata+A:vigastamata GI ;
vihavõitu+A:viha#v´õitu GI ;
vihmata+A:vihmata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@viidakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@viidakil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@viikis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´iikis GI ;
viimistlemata+A:viimistlemata GI ;
vikerkaarevärvi+A:viker#kaare#v´ärvi GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vildakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@vildakil GI ;
viletsavõitu+A:viletsa#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@villis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´il,lis GI ;
vilumusteta+A:vilumusteta GI ;
viluvõitu+A:vilu#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vimmas+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´immas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vines+A:@P.Case.Ine@vines GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vingus+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´ingus GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vinklis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´inklis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vinnas+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´innas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vinnis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´in,nis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vintis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´in,tis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@virevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@virevil GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vissis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´is,sis GI ;
vitsavaevas+A:vitsa#vaevas GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@voltis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´ol,tis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vormis+A:@P.Case.Ine@vormis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@vurhvis+A:@P.Case.Ine@v´urhvis GI ;
võimeteta+A:võimeteta GI ;
võitu+A:v´õitu GI ;
võltsimata+A:võl,tsimata GI ;
vähemtuntud+A:vähem#t´untud GI ;
väiksevõitu+A:v´äikse#v´õitu GI ;
väljaarenemata+A:v´äl,ja#arenemata GI ;
väljasirutatud+A:v´äl,ja#sirutatud GI ;
väljasurnud+A:v´äl,ja#s´urnud GI ;
väljavaadetega+A:v´äl,ja#vaadetega GI ;
värvi+A:v´ärvi GI ;
värvimata+A:v´ärvimata GI ;
väärarenditega+A:v´äär#arenditega GI ;
@P.Case.Short@väärt+A:@P.Case.Short@v´äärt GI ;
vöötidega+A:v´ööt,idega GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@õhevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@õhevil GI ;
õieli+A:õieli GI ;
õies+A:õies GI ;
õigustamata+A:õigustamata GI ;
õitsel+A:´õitsel GI ;
õlekarva+A:õle#k´arva GI ;
ähmasevõitu+A:ähmase#v´õitu GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@ähmis+A:@P.Case.Ine@´ähmis GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@ängis+A:@P.Case.Ine@´ängis GI ;
äraarvamata+A:ära#´arvamata GI ;
@P.Case.Ine@ärevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@ärevil GI ;
ärevuses+A:ärevuses GI ;
ärkvel+A:´ärkvel GI ;
ühendamata+A:ühendamata GI ;
ühestükis+A:ühes#tükis GI ;
ülbevõitu+A:´ülbe#v´õitu GI ;
üldistamata+A:ül,distamata GI ;
üldtunnustatud+A:´üld#tunnustatud GI ;
üldtuntud+A:´üld#t´untud GI ;
ülejäänud+A:üle#jäänud GI ;
ülekantud+A:üle#k´antud GI ;
ülemöödunud+A:üle#m´öödunud GI ;
ümarkantis+A:ümar#k´an,tis GI ;
